District of Columbia statutes.
47-4631

OTO Hotel at Constitution Square Project—tax exemptions.

[Not funded].

History

July 1, 2010, D.C. Law 18-188, § 2(b), 57 DCR 4497

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 18-188 provided:

“Sec. 3. Applicability.

“(a) The real property tax abatement of new D.C. Official Code § 47-4631(b)(1) shall apply as of the date that the real property tax abatement under D.C. Official Code § 47-4612(b)(1) and (2) has reached the aggregate limitation imposed by D.C. Official Code § 47-4612(b)(3).

“(b) This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of Law 18-188 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by Law 18-188, are not in effect.